Source/desktopeditors/dictionaries/uz_Latn_UZ/uz_Latn_UZ.aff
SFX J 0 yimningdirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimningmikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimningku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimga [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimgami [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimgadir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimgada [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimgadirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimgamikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimgaku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimdan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimdanmi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimdandir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimdanda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimdandirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimdanmikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimdanku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimdami [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimdadir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimdada [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimdadirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimdamikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimdaku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yini [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yinimi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yinidir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yinida [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yinidirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yinimikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yiniku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yining [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yiningmi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yiningdir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yiningda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yiningdirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yiningmikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yiningku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yiga [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yigami [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yigadir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yigada [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yigadirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yigamikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yigaku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yidan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yidanmi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yidandir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yidanda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yidandirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yidanmikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yidanku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yidami [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yidadir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yidada [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yidadirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yidamikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yidaku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizni [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimiznimi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimiznidir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimiznida [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimiznidirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimiznimikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizniku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizning [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizningmi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizningdir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizningda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizningdirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizningmikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizningku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizga [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizgami [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizgadir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizgada [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizgadirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizgamikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizgaku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizdan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizdanmi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizdandir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizdanda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizdandirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizdanmikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizdanku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizdami [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizdadir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizdada [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizdadirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizdamikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yimizdaku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizni [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingiznimi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingiznidir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingiznida [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingiznidirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingiznimikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizniku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizning [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizningmi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizningdir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizningda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizningdirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizningmikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizningku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizga [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizgami [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizgadir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizgada [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizgadirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizgamikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizgaku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizdan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizdanmi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizdandir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizdanda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizdandirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizdanmikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizdanku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizdami [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizdadir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizdada [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizdadirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizdamikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 yingizdaku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganningmi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganningdir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganningda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganningdirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganningmikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganningku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimni [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimnimi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimnidir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimnida [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimnidirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimnimikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimniku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimning [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimningmi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimningdir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimningda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimningdirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimningmikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimningku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimga [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimgami [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimgadir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimgada [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimgadirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimgamikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimgaku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimdan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimdanmi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimdandir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimdanda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimdandirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimdanmikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimdanku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimdami [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimdadir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimdada [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimdadirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimdamikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimdaku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganini [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganinimi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganinidir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganinida [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganinidirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganinimikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganiniku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganining [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganiningmi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganiningdir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganiningda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganiningdirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganiningmikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganiningku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganiga [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganigami [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganigadir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganigada [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganigadirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganigamikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganigaku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganidan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganidanmi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganidandir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganidanda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganidandirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganidanmikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganidanku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganidami [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganidadir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganidada [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganidadirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganidamikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganidaku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizni [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimiznimi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimiznidir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimiznida [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimiznidirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimiznimikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizniku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizning [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizningmi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizningdir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizningda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizningdirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizningmikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizningku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizga [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizgami [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizgadir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizgada [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizgadirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizgamikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizgaku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizdan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizdanmi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizdandir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizdanda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizdandirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizdanmikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizdanku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizdami [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizdadir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizdada [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizdadirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizdamikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganimizdaku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizni [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingiznimi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingiznidir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingiznida [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingiznidirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingiznimikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizniku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizning [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizningmi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizningdir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizningda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizningdirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizningmikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizningku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizga [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizgami [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizgadir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizgada [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizgadirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizgamikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizgaku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizdan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizdanmi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizdandir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizdanda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizdandirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizdanmikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizdanku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizdami [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizdadir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizdada [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizdadirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizdamikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganingizdaku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarningmi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarningdir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarningda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarningdirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarningmikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarningku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimni [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimnimi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimnidir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimnida [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimnidirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimnimikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimniku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimning [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimningmi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimningdir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimningda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimningdirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimningmikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimningku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimga [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimgami [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimgadir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimgada [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimgadirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimgamikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimgaku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimdan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimdanmi [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimdandir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimdanda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimdandirda [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimdanmikan [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimdanku [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimdami [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
SFX J 0 ydiganlarimdadir [ayeyoiouo‘eyuya]
